Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2221.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Ashley E. Woolridge Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Ashley E. Woolridge was born November 8, 1916.(2) Mr. Woolridge attended Clearfield Public School, where he graduated in 1934.(3) Mr. Woolridge then attended West Point Military Academy from 1934 to 1935.(4) Mr. Woolridge received his bachelor of science degree from Lock Haven State Teachers College in 1939 and then attended Penn State College Graduate School, where he was enrolled in the master's program in Education Administration before being called into service in 1941.12345678910111213141516171819 (5) Outside of work, Mr. Woolridge enjoyed his family, horses, flying, the mountains, hunting and fishing.(6) Mr. Woolridge also mined surface coal for over 50 years and taught related mathematics, science and English at Hanover High School.(7) Mr. Woolridge completed U.S. Army Air Corps (USAAC) Flying School in July 1942, commissioned as a Second Lieutenant as a rated pilot in the USAAC.(8) Mr. Woolridge went overseas during September 1943 as pilot and flight leader in the 319th Bombardment Group and flew a Martin B-26 Marauder.(9) Throughout his service, Mr. Woolridge would fly the North Atlantic (Labrador, Greenland, Iceland and England), Africa during an invasion in November 1942, Sardinia, Corsica and France.(10) Mr. Woolridge was placed in command of the 320th Bombardment Group in the 12th Air Force on November 1, 1944, and then promoted to Colonel in February 1945 after 106 combat missions.(11) Mr. Woolridge was honorably discharged in November 1945.(12) Mr. Woolridge earned decorations such as the Silver Star, Distinguished Flying Cross with two clusters, Air Medal with 23 clusters, Presidential Unit Citation with two clusters and two Croix de Guerre avec Palme.(13) Mr. Woolridge passed away on May 3, 2004, at a hospital in Pittsburgh.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 52427, carrying Pennsylvania Route 970 over the West Branch of the Susquehanna River in Bradford Township, Clearfield County, 20260HB2221PN2915 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is designated as the Ashley E. Woolridge Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2221PN2915 - 3 - 123456